Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 20. Offenses Against Property.

Secs. 11.20.010 — 11.20.070.
Arson and Related Crimes.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law, see AS 11.46.400 — 11.46.450.]

Secs. 11.20.080 — 11.20.135.
Burglary.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law, see AS 11.46.300 — 11.46.310.]

Secs. 11.20.140 — 11.20.277.
Larceny.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current provisions on theft, see AS 11.46.100 — 11.46.295.]

Secs. 11.20.280 — 11.20.340.
Embezzlement.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For theft by failure to make required disposition of funds received or held, see AS 11.46.210.]

Sec. 11.20.345.
Extortion.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law, see AS 11.41.520.]

Sec. 11.20.350.
Receiving Stolen Goods.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978. For current law, see AS 11.46.190 and 11.46.210.]

Secs. 11.20.360 — 11.20.510.
False Pretenses and Frauds. [Repealed, § 4 ch 184 SLA 1968 and § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For theft by deception, see AS 11.46.180; for business and commercial offenses, see AS 11.46.600 — 11.46.740.]

Secs. 11.20.515 — 11.20.650.
Malicious Mischief and Trespass.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 144 SLA 1975 and § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For criminal trespass, see AS 11.46.320 — 11.46.350; for criminal mischief, see AS 11.46.475 — 11.46.486.]

Sec. 11.20.660.
[Renumbered as AS 11.76.120.]

Secs. 11.20.670 — 11.20.690.
Misuse, Damage, or Destruction.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For criminal mischief, see AS 11.46.475 — 11.46.486.]